Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20143-319.01
Zoning regulations; appeal; hearing; procedure; board; duties.

(1) Any
person aggrieved or
taxpayer affected by
any decision of an administrative agency made in its administration of airport
zoning regulations adopted under the
Airport Zoning Act, or any governing body of a political subdivision which
is of the opinion that a decision of such an administrative agency is an improper
application of airport zoning regulations of concern to such governing body, may appeal to the board of adjustment
authorized to hear and decide appeals from the decisions of such administrative
agency.

(2) Any appeal
taken under this section shall be taken within a reasonable amount of time,
as provided by the rules of the board, by filing with the agency from which
the appeal is taken and with the board, a notice of appeal specifying the
grounds thereof. The agency from which the appeal is taken shall forthwith
transmit to the board all the papers constituting the record upon which the
action appealed from was taken.

(3) An appeal shall stay any proceeding
in furtherance of the action appealed from, unless the agency from which the
appeal is taken certifies to the board, after the notice of appeal has been
filed with it, that by reason of the facts stated in the certificate a stay
would, in its opinion, cause imminent peril to life or property. In such cases
the proceedings shall not be stayed except by an order of the board after
notice to the agency from which the appeal is taken and upon due cause shown.

(4) The board
shall fix a reasonable time for the hearing of appeals, give public notice
thereof, give due notice to the parties in interest, and decide the appeal
within sixty days after the date of filing such appeal. Any party may appear
in person or by an agent or attorney at the hearing.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 8(1), p. 686;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 3-314;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 15.